Mississippi, session 2026, HB1686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A person who controls the premises of a commercial enterprise may not allow sexually oriented performance to be presented on the premises in the presence of an individual younger than eighteen (18) years of age.  For purposes of this act, "sexually oriented performance" means any performance that would violate the Walker Montgomery Act if witnessed online (2  )A person who violates this section shall be liable to this state for a civil penalty of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. (3)  The Attorney General may bring an action to (1) recover the civil penalty imposed under this section; or (2) obtain a temporary or permanent injunction to restrain the violation. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.